Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.150

Claims against district board—Procedure upon allowance.

Any claim against the district shall be presented to the board. Upon allowance of the claim, the board shall submit a voucher, signed by the chair and one other member of the board, to the county auditor for the issuance of a warrant in payment of said claim. This procedure for payment of claims shall apply to the reimbursement of board members for their actual and necessary expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4160; 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 15.]